Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska36-815
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Uniform Voidable Transactions Act modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., as the act existed on September 1, 2019, but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2019, LB70, § 15.